Delaware, session 153, SB199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Section 3 of Chapter 44 of Volume 85 of the Laws of Delaware by deleting Section 3 of Chapter 44 of Volume 85 of the Laws of Delaware in its entirety and inserting in lieu thereof the following: âSection 3. This Act takes effect on January 31, 2026.â. Section 2. This Act takes effect retroactively as of the enactment of Chapter 44 of Volume 85 of the Laws of Delaware. Section 3. This Act does not affect or limit the retroactive effect of Section 2 of Chapter 44 of Volume 85 of the Laws of Delaware.